Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-529
Decree; filing; fees.

Within thirty days after the district has been declared a corporation by the Chief Water Officer, the Chief Water Officer shall transmit to the Secretary of State and to the county clerk in each of the counties having lands in the district copies of the findings and the decree of the Chief Water Officer incorporating the district. The same shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, in the same manner as articles of incorporation are now required to be filed under the general laws concerning corporations, and also be filed in the office of the county clerk of each county in which a part of the district is located where they shall become permanent records. The clerk in each county shall receive a fee of one dollar for filing and preserving the same. The Secretary of State shall receive for filing the copies such fees as now are or hereafter may be provided by law for like services in similar cases.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 8, p. 531;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 164.